Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 10.3 Divestiture of Investments in Iran

35-10.3-1.
Legislative findings. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

It is hereby found by the general assembly as follows:

The United States Department of State has determined that Iran supports acts of international terrorism; and

A resolution of the United Nations Security Council imposes sanctions on Iran for its failure to suspend its uranium-enrichment activities; and

The United Nations Security Council voted unanimously for an additional embargo on Iranian arms exports, which is a freeze on assets abroad of an expanded list of individuals and companies involved in Iran’s nuclear and ballistic missile programs and further, calls for nations and institutions to bar new grants or loans to Iran except for humanitarian and developmental purposes; and

All United States and foreign entities that have invested more than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in Iran’s energy sector since August 5, 1996, are subject to sanctions under United States law pursuant to the Iran and Libya Sanctions Act of 1996; and

The United States renewed the Iran and Libya Sanctions Act of 1996 in 2001 and 2006; and

The United States Congress recently acted to pass the Comprehensive Iran Sanctions, Accountability, and Divestment Act of 2010, in light of diplomatic efforts to address Iran’s illicit nuclear efforts, unconventional and ballistic missile development programs, and support for international terrorism are more likely to be effective if the president is empowered with explicit authority to impose additional sanctions on the government of Iran; the people of the United States have feelings of friendship for the people of Iran and regret that developments in recent decades have created impediments to that friendship; and additional funding should be provided to the secretary of state to document and disseminate information about human rights abuses in Iran, including abuses that have taken place since the June 2009 presidential election in Iran. Furthermore, the law authorizes state and local governments to divest public assets from, or prohibit public investment in, certain investment activities in Iran; and

It is a fundamental responsibility of the state of Rhode Island to decide where, how, and by whom financial resources in its control should be invested, taking into account numerous pertinent factors; and

It is the judgment of the Rhode Island general assembly that this act should remain in effect only insofar as it continues to be consistent with, and does not unduly interfere with, the foreign policy of the United States as determined by the federal government; and

While the Rhode Island general assembly is sensitive to the welfare of the people of Iran, divestiture may improve the human condition, safety, and security of those currently living in Iran and surrounding states, and it is the responsibility of the state of Iran to provide human rights to its people; and,

It is the judgment of this Rhode Island general assembly that mandatory divestment of public funds from certain companies is a measure that should be employed sparingly and judiciously, and with the hope that these peaceful sanctions will prevent the Iranian regime from obtaining nuclear weapons and continuing the spread of terror.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-2.
Definitions. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Active business operations” means all business operations that are not inactive business operations.

“Business operations” means engaging in commerce in any form in Iran, including by acquiring, developing, maintaining, owning, selling, possessing, leasing, or operating equipment, facilities, personnel, products, services, personal property, real property, or any other apparatus of business or commerce.

“Company” means any sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or business association, including all wholly-owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of such entities or business associations, that exist for profit-making purposes.

“Direct holdings” in a company, means all securities of that company held directly by the public fund or in an account or fund in which the public fund owns all shares or interests.

“Iran” means the government of Iran, and includes the territory of Iran and any other territory or marine area, including the exclusive economic zone and continental shelf, over which the government of Iran claims sovereignty, sovereign rights, or jurisdiction, provided that the government of Iran exercises partial or total control over the area or derives a benefit from economic activity in the area pursuant to international arrangements.

“Inactive business operations” means the mere continued holding or renewal of rights to property previously operated for the purpose of generating revenues but not presently deployed for such purpose.

“Indirect holdings” in a company means all securities of that company held in an account or fund, such as a mutual fund, managed by one or more persons not employed by the public fund, in which the public fund owns shares or interests together with other investors not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

“Public fund” means Rhode Island state pension funds or the state investment commission in charge of the Rhode Island state pension funds.

“Scrutinized business operations” means any and all active business operations that are subject or liable to sanctions under Public Law 104-172, as amended, the “Iran Sanctions Act of 1996,” and that involve the maintenance of a company’s existing assets or investments in Iran, or the deployment of new investments to Iran that meet or exceed the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) threshold referred to in Public Law 104-172, as amended, the “Iran Sanctions Act of 1996.” “Scrutinized operations” does not include the retail sale of gasoline and related products.

“Scrutinized company” means any company engaging in scrutinized business operations.

“Substantial action” means adopting, publicizing, and implementing a formal plan to cease scrutinized business operations within one year and to refrain from any such new business operations; undertaking significant humanitarian efforts on behalf of one or more marginalized populations of Iran; or through engagement with the government of Iran.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-3.
Identification of companies. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

Within ninety (90) days following the effective date of this chapter, the public fund shall make its best efforts to identify all scrutinized companies in which the public fund has direct or indirect holdings or could possibly have such holdings in the future. Such efforts shall include, as appropriate:

Reviewing and relying, as appropriate in the public fund’s judgment, on publicly available information regarding companies with business operations in Iran, including information provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, international organizations, and government entities; and/or

Contacting asset managers contracted by the public fund that invest in companies with business operations in Iran; and/or

Contacting other institutional investors that have divested from and/or engaged with companies that have business operations in Iran.

By the first meeting of the public fund following the ninety (90) day period described in subsection (a), the public fund shall assemble all scrutinized companies identified into a “scrutinized companies list.”

The public fund shall update the scrutinized companies list on an annual basis based on evolving information from, among other sources, those listed in subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-4.
Required actions. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

The public fund shall adhere to the following procedures for companies on the scrutinized companies list:

Engagement:

The public fund shall immediately determine the companies on the scrutinized companies list in which the public fund owns direct or indirect holdings.

For each company identified in paragraph (1)(i) with only inactive business operations, the public fund shall send a written notice informing the company of this chapter and encouraging it to continue to refrain from initiating active business operations in Iran until it is able to avoid scrutinized business operations. The public fund shall continue such correspondence on a semi-annual basis.

For each company newly identified in paragraph (1)(i) with active business operations, the public fund shall send a written notice informing the company of its scrutinized company status and that it may become subject to divestment by the public fund. The notice shall offer the company the opportunity to clarify its Iran-related activities and shall encourage the company, within ninety (90) days, to either cease its scrutinized business operations or convert such operations to inactive business operations in order to avoid qualifying for divestment by the public fund.

If, within ninety (90) days following the public fund’s first engagement with a company pursuant to paragraph (1)(iii), that company ceases scrutinized business operations, the company shall be removed from the scrutinized companies list and the provisions of this section shall cease to apply to it unless it resumes scrutinized business operations. If, within ninety (90) days following the public fund’s first engagement, the company converts its scrutinized active business operations to inactive business operations, the company shall be subject to all provisions relating thereto.

Divestment:

If, after ninety (90) days following the public fund’s first engagement with a company pursuant to paragraph (1)(iii) of this section, the company continues to have scrutinized active business operations, and only while such company continues to have scrutinized active business operations, the public fund shall sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all publicly-traded securities of the company, except as provided below, according to the following schedule:

At least fifty percent (50%) of such assets shall be removed from the public fund’s assets under management by nine (9) months after the company’s most recent appearance on the scrutinized companies list.

One hundred percent (100%) of such assets shall be removed from the public fund’s assets under management within fifteen (15) months after the company’s most recent appearance on the scrutinized companies list.

If a company that ceased scrutinized active business operations following engagement pursuant to paragraph (1)(iii) of this section resumes such operations, paragraph (2)(i) shall immediately apply, and the public fund shall send a written notice to the company. The company shall also be immediately reintroduced onto the scrutinized companies list.

Prohibition:

At no time shall the public fund acquire securities of companies on the scrutinized companies list that have active business operations, except as provided below.

Exemption:

No company which the United States government affirmatively declares to be excluded from its present or any future federal sanctions regime relating to Iran shall be subject to divestment or investment prohibition pursuant to subdivisions (2) and (3), nor any company which is primarily engaged in supplying goods or services intended to relieve human suffering in Iran or that is primarily engaged in promoting health, education, or journalistic, religious, or welfare activities in Iran.

Excluded Securities:

Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, subdivisions (2) and (3) shall not apply to indirect holdings in actively managed investment funds. The public fund shall, however, submit letters to the managers of such investment funds containing companies with scrutinized active business operations requesting that they consider removing such companies from the fund or create a similar actively managed fund with indirect holdings devoid of such companies. If the manager creates a similar fund, the public fund shall replace all applicable investments with investments in the similar fund in an expedited timeframe consistent with prudent investing standards. For the purposes of this section, “private equity” funds shall be deemed to be actively managed investment funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-5.
Required actions — Reporting. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

The public fund shall file a publicly available report to the Rhode Island general assembly and office of the attorney general that includes the scrutinized companies list within thirty (30) days after the list is created.

Annually thereafter, the public fund shall file a publicly available report to the Rhode Island general assembly and the office of the attorney general and send a copy of that report to the United States Presidential Special Envoy to Iran (or an appropriate designee or successor) that includes:

A summary of correspondence with companies engaged by the public fund under paragraphs

35-10.3-4(1)(ii)

and

35-10.3-4(1)(iii)

;

All investments sold, redeemed, divested, or withdrawn in compliance with subdivision

35-10.3-4(2)

;

All prohibited investments under subdivision

35-10.3-4(3)

; and

Any progress made under subdivision

35-10.3-4(5)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-6.
Provisions for repeal of chapter. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

This chapter shall be repealed upon affirmative action of the general assembly. Provided, that in determining whether to repeal this chapter, by way of suggestion and guidance only and without binding or in any way inhibiting the discretion of future sessions of the general assembly, it is submitted that the occurrence of any of the following should be construed and deemed to be a basis for repealing this chapter:

Iran is removed from the United States Department of State’s list of countries that have been determined to repeatedly provide support for acts of international terrorism; or

The President of the United States determines and certifies that state legislation similar to this section interferes with the conduct of United States foreign policy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-7.
Other legal obligations. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

With respect to actions taken in compliance with this chapter, including all good faith determinations regarding companies as required by this chapter, the public fund shall be exempt from any conflicting statutory or common law obligations, including any such obligations with respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds, or investments for the public fund’s securities portfolios.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-8.
Reinvestment in certain companies with scrutinized active business operations. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the public fund shall be permitted to cease divesting from certain scrutinized companies pursuant to §

35-10.3-4

and/or reinvest in certain scrutinized companies from which it divested pursuant to §

35-10.3-4

if clear and convincing evidence shows that the value for all assets under management by the public fund becomes equal to or less than ninety-nine and one-half percent (99.50%) or fifty (50) basis points of the hypothetical value of all assets under management by the public fund assuming no divestment for any company had occurred under subdivision

35-10.3-4(2)

.

Cessation of divestment, reinvestment, and/or any subsequent ongoing investment authorized by this section shall be strictly limited to the minimum steps necessary to avoid the contingency set forth in subsection (a). For any cessation of divestment, reinvestment, and/or subsequent ongoing investment authorized by this section, the public fund shall provide a written report to the Rhode Island general assembly and the office of the attorney general in advance of initial reinvestment, updated semi-annually thereafter as applicable, setting forth the reasons and justification, supported by clear and convincing evidence, for its decisions to cease divestment, reinvest, and/or remain invested in companies with scrutinized active business operations.

This section has no application to reinvestment in companies on the ground that they have ceased to be a scrutinized company engaged in active business operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-9.
Enforcement. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

The attorney general is charged with enforcing the provisions of this chapter and, through any lawful designee, may bring such actions in court as are necessary to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.

35-10.3-10.
Severability. [Expires July 1, 2018.]

If any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is found to be invalid, illegal, unenforceable or unconstitutional, the same is hereby declared to be severable and the balance of this chapter shall remain effective and functional notwithstanding such invalidity, illegality, unenforceability or unconstitutionality. The Rhode Island general assembly hereby declares that it would have passed this chapter, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word be declared invalid, illegal, unenforceable or unconstitutional, including, but not limited to, each of the engagement, divestment, and prohibition provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 1.